Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 2
REPRESENTATIVE DISTRICTS - APPORTIONMENT

2-2-201 to 2-2-208. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire part repealed, (HB 17-1025), ch. 21, p. 67, § 1, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was numbered as article 9 of chapter 63, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 2017, consult the 2016 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.